en: cold smoked with cabernet wine
bg: студено пушен с каберне совиньон
ca: fred fumat amb vi cabernet
de: kalt geräuchert mit Cabernet-Wein
es: ahumado en frío con vino Cabernet
fr: fumé à froid avec du vin Cabernet
hu: cabernet borral hidegen füstölt
it: affumicato a freddo con vino Cabernet
ja: カベルネワインで冷燻製
nl: koud gerookt met cabernetwijn
pl: cold smoked z winem cabernet
pt: defumado a frio com vinho Cabernet
sv: kallrökt med cabernetvin, kallrökta med cabernetvin

en: alderwood smoked, smoked over alderwood
de: erlenholzgeräuchert
es: ahumado de madera de aliso
fr: fumé au bois d'aulne
hu: égerfán füstölt
it: affumicato di ontano
nl: gerookt op elsenhout
pt: defumado de madeira de amieiro
sv: rökt över alved, rökta över alved

en: apple wood smoked
de: apfelholzgeräuchert
es: ahumado de madera de manzano
fr: fumé au bois de pommier
hu: almafán füstölt
it: affumicato di melo
nl: gerookt op appelhout
pt: defumado de madeira de macieira
sv: rökt över äppelved, rökta över äppelved

en: beech smoked
es: ahumado de haya
fr: fumé au bois de hêtre, fumée au bois de hêtre, fumés au bois de hêtre, fumées au bois de hêtre
hu: bükkfán füstölt
it: affumicato di faggio
nl: gerookt op beukenhout
pt: defumado de faia
sv: bokspånsrökt, bokspånsrökta

en: cherrywood smoked
es: ahumado de madera de cerezo
fr: fumé au bois de cerisier
hu: cseresznyefa füstölt
nl: gerookt op kersenhout
pt: defumado de madeira de cerejeira

de: edelholzrauch
es: ahumado de maderas nobles
fr: fumé au bois noble
it: affumicato di legni nobili
nl: gerookt op edelhout
pt: defumado de madeiras nobres
sv: rökt över ädellut, rökta över ädellut

en: hickory smoked, hot smoked from hickory
fr: fumé au bois de caryer

en: maple smoked
fr: fumé à l'érable
it: affumicato di acero
nl: gerookt op esdoornhout
pt: defumado de bordo
sv: rökt över lönnved, rökta över lönnved

en: mesquite smoked
de: mesquite geräuchert
es: ahumado de mezquite
fr: fumé au mesquite
it: affumicato di mesquite
nl: gerookt op mesquitehout
pt: defumado de mesquite
sv: rökt över mesquiteved, rökta över mesquiteved

en: oak smoked
de: eichenholzgeräuchert
es: ahumado de roble
fr: fumé au chêne
hu: tölgyfán füstölt
it: affumicato di quercia
nl: gerookt op eikenhout
pt: defumado de carvalho
sv: rökt över ekved, rökta över ekved

en: not smoked, unsmoked
de: nicht geräuchert, ungeräuchert
es: no ahumado, sin ahumar
fr: non fumé, non fumée
hr: ne dimljen, nedimljen
hu: nem füstölt, füstöletlen
it: non affumicato, non fumato
nl: niet gerookt, ongerookt
pl: nie wędzony, niewędzony
pt: não defumado, não fumado
sv: inte rökt, orökt, inte rökta, orökta

de: aus Früchten
en: from fruits
fr: à base de fruits

en: sprouted
sv: groddad, groddat, groddade

en: non-hydrogenated, unhydrogenated, unhardened
bg: нехидрогенирано, нехидрогениран
ca: no hidrogenat, no hidrogenada, sense hidrogenar
da: ikke-hydrogeneret
de: unhydriertes, ungehärtet, ungehärtetes
es: no hidrogenado, no hidrogenada
fi: kovettamaton, hydrogenoimaton
fr: non hydrogénée, non hydrogénées
hr: nehidrogenirani, nehidrogenirana, nehidrogenizirana, nehidrogenizirano
hu: nem hidrogénezett
it: non idrogenato, non idrogenati
nl: niet gehydrogeneerd, niet gehydrogeneerde
pl: nieuwodorniony, nieutwardzony, nieutwardzone
pt: nâo hidrogenada
ro: nehidrogenate, nehidrogenat
sv: ohärdad, ohärdat, ohärdade, icke-hydrogenerad, icke-hydrogenerat, icke-hydrogenerade

en: hydrolysed, hydrolized, hydrolised
de: hydrolisiert, hydrolisierte, hydrolisierten, hydrolisiertem, hydrolisierter, hydrolisiertes
fr: hydrolisé, hydrolisée, hydrolisés, hydrolisées
hr: hidrolizat, hidrolizirane, hidrolizirano, hidrolizirani
lt: hidrolizuotas, hidrolizuota, hidrolizuoti
lv: hidrolizēts, hidrolizēta, hidrolizēti
nl: gehydrolyseerd, gehydrolyseerde
pl: hydrolizat, hydrolizowane
pt: hidrolisada
ro: hidrolizat, hidrolizate
sk: hydrolyzovaný, hydrolyzovaná, hydrolyzované
sv: hydrolyserat, hydrolyserad, hydrolyserade
uk: гідролізований, гідролізована, гідролізоване, гідролізовані

en: hydrogenated, hardened
bg: хидрогениран, хидрогенирано
ca: hidrogenat, hidrogenada
da: hærdet
de: Gehärtetes
es: hidrogenado
fi: kovetettu, hydrogenoitu
fr: hydrogénée
hr: očvrsnuto, skrućeno, djelomično skrućeno, djelomično očvrsnute
hu: hidrogénezett
it: idrogenato, idrogenati, idrogenata, idrogenate
nl: Gehydrogeneerde
pl: uwodorniony, uwodorniona, uwodornione, utwardzony, utwardzone, utwardzona
sv: härdad, härdat, härdade
uk: гідрогенований, гідрогенована, гідрогеноване, гідрогеновані

en: fully hydrogenated
bg: напълно хидрогениран, напълно хидрогенирано
ca: totalment hidrogenat, totalment hidrogenada
da: helt hærdet, helt haerdet
de: ganz gehärtetes, vollständig hydriertes, ganz gehärtet
es: totalmente hidrogenado, totalmente hidrogenada
fi: kokonaan kovetettu
fr: totalement hydrogénée
hr: potpuno hidrogenirana, potpuno hidrogenirane, potpuno hidrogenirano, potpuno hidrogenizirana
nb: fullherdet
nl: geheel gehard, geheel geharde, volledig gehydrogeneerde
pl: całkowicie uwodorniony, całkowicie uwodorniona, całkowicie uwodornione, całkowicie utwardzony, całkowicie utwardzona, całkowicie utwardzone
sv: fullhärdad, fullhärdat, fullhärdade

en: partially hydrogenated, partially hardened
bg: частично хидрогениран, частично хидрогенирано
ca: parcialment hidrogenat, parcialment hidrogenada
da: delvist hydrogeniseret
de: teilweise hydriertes, teilweise gehärtetes
es: parcialmente hidrogenado, parcialmente hidrogenada
fi: osittain kovetettu, osittain hydrogenoitu
fr: partiellement hydrogénée
hr: djelomično hidrogenirane
hu: részben hidrogénezett
it: parzialmente idrogenato, parzialmente idrogenati
nl: gedeeltelijk gehydrogeneerd, gedeeltelijk gehydrogeneerde, gedeeltelijk geharde
pl: częściowo uwodorniony, częściowo uwodorniona, częściowo uwodornione, częściowo utwardzony, częściowo utwardzona, częściowo utwardzone
pt: parcialmente hidrogenada
ro: parțial hidrogenate
sv: delvis härdad, delvis härdat, delvis härdade

en: textured
de: texturiert, texturierte, texturierter, texturiertes, texturierten, texturiertem
es: texturizado, texturizada
fr: texturé, texturée
it: testurizzato, testurizzata
nl: getextureerd
pl: teksturowany, teksturowana, teksturowane
pt: texturizado, texturizada
ro: texturat, texturată, texturate, texturați
sv: texturerad, texturerat, texturerade
uk: текстуроване

en: processed with alkali
bg: обработено с щелоч
ca: processat amb àlcali
da: behandlet med alkali
de: mit Alkali verarbeitet
es: procesado con álcali
fi: käsitelty alkalilla
fr: traité à l'alcali
hr: obrađeno s alkalijem
hu: alkalival kezelt
it: lavorato con alcali
nl: verwerkt met alkali
pl: przetworzone z alkalicznym
pt: processado com álcali
ro: prelucrat cu alcali
sv: behandlad med alkali, behandlat med alkali, behandlade med alkali
uk: алкалізований, алкалізована, алкалізоване, алкалізовані